Ohio, session 136, HB254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 3701.147 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 3701.147. (A) The department of health, in 7
coordination with the department of aging, the commission on 8
minority health, and community organizations focusing on 9
Alzheimer's disease and other types of dementia awareness, shall 10
incorporate awareness information into relevant public health 11
outreach conducted by the department of health. 12
(B) The parties described in division (A) of this section 13
shall design the information to educate and increase awareness 14
and understanding among health care providers, community 15
organizations, and the general public on the following topics 16
related to cognitive impairment, Alzheimer's disease, and other 17
types of dementia: 18
(1) Early warning signs; 19
(2) The value of reducing risk factors of Alzheimer's 20

H. B. No. 254 Page 2
As Introduced
disease and other types of dementia, including through 21
conducting healthy brain initiatives and disseminating healthy 22
lifestyle materials; 23
(3) The importance of early detection and timely 24
diagnosis; 25
(4) How to reduce the risk of cognitive decline, 26
particularly among individuals from broad cultural, ethnic, 27
racial, geographic, and socioeconomic backgrounds and those 28
disproportionately affected by dementia who are at greater risk 29
of developing Alzheimer's disease or other types of dementia; 30
(5) Assessment tools for detection and diagnosis; 31
(6) The importance of an annual medicare wellness visit or 32
other annual physical for individuals sixty-five years of age 33
and older for cognitive health, including the medicare plan 34
billing code for treatment relating to cognitive impairment. 35